Florida, session 2026, SB126.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 77 78 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 350.01, Florida 79 Statutes, is amended to read: 80 350.01âFlorida Public Service Commission; terms of 81 commissioners; vacancies; election and duties of chair; quorum; 82 proceedings; public records and public meetings exemptions.â 83 (1)âThe Florida Public Service Commission shall be composed 84 consist of seven five commissioners appointed pursuant to s. 85 350.031. One member must be a certified public accountant, and 86 one member must be a chartered financial analyst. 87 Section 2.âSection 350.0615, Florida Statutes, is created 88 to read: 89 350.0615âPublic Counsel; requirement to negotiate.âFor 90 proceedings before the commission in which the Public Counsel is 91 participating as a party, any other group of parties to the 92 proceeding, before presenting a settlement of the proceeding to 93 the commission, must negotiate in good faith with the Public 94 Counsel the terms of such settlement. 95 Section 3.âSection 350.129, Florida Statutes, is created to 96 read: 97 350.129âOrders of the Florida Public Service Commission.â 98 (1)âAll orders issued by the commission must contain 99 adequate support and rationale for the commissionâs conclusions, 100 including the specific facts and factors on which the 101 conclusions are based. While the commission may make conclusions 102 based upon the public interest, it shall specify in its orders a 103 rationale for such conclusions. 104 (2)âFor commission orders that affect substantial interests 105 pursuant to s. 120.569, when issuing an order accepting or 106 denying a settlement agreement reached by any of the parties to 107 a proceeding, all of the following requirements apply: 108 (a)âThe commission shall provide a reasoned explanation, 109 citing the specific facts and factors on which it relied. The 110 commission shall provide in its order a discussion of the major 111 elements of the settlement and a rationale for its conclusions. 112 (b)âThe Public Counsel is not a required party to such a 113 settlement. However, the commission may not approve a settlement 114 presented by parties that have not negotiated the terms of such 115 settlement in good faith with the Public Counsel. 116 Section 4.âSection 350.130, Florida Statutes, is created to 117 read: 118 350.130âIntervention into commission proceedings.âPersons 119 other than the original parties to a pending commission 120 proceeding, whose substantial interest will be affected by the 121 commission proceeding and who desire to become parties to the 122 proceeding, may make a motion to the commission for leave to 123 intervene in the proceeding pursuant to chapter 120. 124 (1)âAny trade, professional, or similar association seeking 125 to intervene in a commission proceeding on the basis of the 126 impact of such proceeding on the associationâs membership must 127 include in such motion the nature of the associationâs 128 membership, the manner in which such membership will be 129 substantially impacted by the proceeding, and the number and 130 percentage of total members who will be substantially impacted 131 by the proceeding. 132 (2)âIn order to avoid any unnecessary rate case expense 133 resulting from a party participating in a proceeding in which it 134 does not have standing, the commission shall rule on any 135 challenge to a partyâs intervention in a proceeding on the basis 136 of standing on a timely basis and, at a minimum, within 30 days 137 after receiving such challenge. 138 Section 5.âSection 350.131, Florida Statutes, is created to 139 read: 140 350.131âAffordability.âThe commission must consider and 141 address affordability in any proceeding before it that has the 142 potential to impact utility rates. 143 Section 6.âPresent subsection (4) of section 366.06, 144 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5), a new 145 subsection (4) is added to that section, and subsections (1) and 146 (2) of that section are amended, to read: 147 366.06âRates; procedure for fixing and changing.â 148 (1)âA public utility shall not, directly or indirectly, 149 charge or receive any rate not on file with the commission for 150 the particular class of service involved, and no change shall be 151 made in any schedule. All applications for changes in rates 152 shall be made to the commission in writing under rules and 153 regulations prescribed, and the commission shall have the 154 authority to determine and fix affordable, fair, just, and 155 reasonable rates that may be requested, demanded, charged, or 156 collected by any public utility for its service. Any application 157 for a change in rates which also includes a request for a change 158 in return on equity must be made according to the schedule and 159 procedure established by the commission pursuant to s. 366.07. 160 The commission shall investigate and determine the actual 161 legitimate costs of the property of each utility company, 162 actually used and useful in the public service, and shall keep a 163 current record of the net investment of each public utility 164 company in such property which value, as determined by the 165 commission, shall be used for ratemaking purposes and shall be 166 the money honestly and prudently invested by the public utility 167 company in such property used and useful in serving the public, 168 less accrued depreciation, and shall not include any goodwill or 169 going-concern value or franchise value in excess of payment made 170 therefor. In fixing affordable, fair, just, and reasonable rates 171 for each customer class, the commission shall, to the extent 172 practicable, consider the cost of providing service to the 173 class, as well as the rate history, value of service, and 174 experience of the public utility; the consumption and load 175 characteristics of the various classes of customers; and public 176 acceptance of rate structures. 177 (2)âWhenever the commission finds, upon request made or 178 upon its own motion, that the rates demanded, charged, or 179 collected by any public utility for public utility service, or 180 that the rules, regulations, or practices of any public utility 181 affecting such rates, are unaffordable, unjust, unreasonable, 182 unjustly discriminatory, or in violation of law; that such rates 183 are insufficient to yield reasonable compensation for the 184 services rendered; that such rates yield excessive compensation 185 for services rendered; or that such service is inadequate or 186 cannot be obtained, the commission shall order and hold a public 187 hearing, giving notice to the public and to the public utility, 188 and shall thereafter determine affordable, just, and reasonable 189 rates to be thereafter charged for such service and promulgate 190 rules and regulations affecting equipment, facilities, and 191 service to be thereafter installed, furnished, and used. Any 192 request made by a public utility pursuant to this section which 193 involves a request for a change in return on equity must be made 194 according to the schedule and procedure established by the 195 commission pursuant to s. 366.07. 196 (4)âIn setting and evaluating the return on equity for a 197 public utility as part of a rate proceeding: 198 (a)âAny financial model used by the commission must be: 199 1.âFinancially logical; and 200 2.âGenerally used and accepted by finance practitioners 201 both within and outside of the regulated utility industry; and 202 (b)âThe commission shall specifically consider and address 203 the financial benefits and the reduction in regulatory, weather, 204 disaster, and general financial risk to the public utility 205 provided by all of the following which are relevant to the 206 public utility: 207 1.âEnvironmental cost recovery under s. 366.8255. 208 2.âStorm-recovery financing under s. 366.8260. 209 3.âInterim storm-recovery cost recovery under s. 366.8261. 210 4.âCost recovery for the siting, design, licensing, and 211 construction of nuclear and integrated gasification combined 212 cycle power plants under s. 366.93. 213 5.âFinancing for certain nuclear generating asset 214 retirement or abandonment costs under s. 366.95. 215 6.âStorm protection plan cost recovery under s. 366.96. 216 7.âPublic utility liability arising out of emergencies and 217 disasters under s. 366.98. 218 8.âNatural gas facilities relocation costs under s. 366.99. 219 Section 7.âSection 366.07, Florida Statutes, is amended to 220 read: 221 366.07âRates; adjustment.â 222 (1)âWhenever the commission, after public hearing either 223 upon its own motion or upon complaint, shall find the rates, 224 rentals, charges or classifications, or any of them, proposed, 225 demanded, observed, charged or collected by any public utility 226 for any service, or in connection therewith, or the rules, 227 regulations, measurements, practices or contracts, or any of 228 them, relating thereto, are unaffordable, unjust, unreasonable, 229 insufficient, excessive, or unjustly discriminatory or 230 preferential, or in anywise in violation of law, or any service 231 is inadequate or cannot be obtained, the commission shall 232 determine and by order fix the affordable, fair, and reasonable 233 rates, rentals, charges or classifications, and reasonable 234 rules, regulations, measurements, practices, contracts or 235 service, to be imposed, observed, furnished or followed in the 236 future. 237 (2)âThe commission shall establish a schedule by which 238 requests for changes to a public utilityâs return on equity may 239 be submitted to the commission by each public utility. The 240 commission may not accept a request from a public utility to 241 modify its return on equity outside of this established 242 schedule, except as provided in subsection (3). 243 (3)âA public utility may petition the commission to deviate 244 from the return on equity revision schedule established by the 245 commission under subsection (2). The commission shall grant such 246 petition if: 247 (a)âThe public utilityâs rates are insufficient to yield 248 reasonable compensation for the services it is rendering; 249 (b)âThis insufficiency is due to circumstances that are 250 outside of the control of the public utility; and 251 (c)âSuch circumstances were not reasonably foreseeable by 252 the public utility during the last proceeding in which its 253 return on equity was approved by the commission. 254 (4)âThe commission shall adopt rules to implement this 255 section. 256 Section 8.âSection 366.077, Florida Statutes, is created to 257 read: 258 366.077âReport on rates.âThe commission shall submit an 259 annual report to the Governor and the Legislature by March 1. 260 (1)âThe report must include all of the following: 261 (a)âAn investigation of contemporary economic analyses 262 related to rate changes in this state. 263 (b)âAn analysis of potential cost impacts to utility 264 customers in this state if excess returns on equity have 265 occurred and, if such excess returns have not occurred at a 266 significant rate, any resulting cost savings to such customers. 267 (c)âAn analysis of returns on equity models presented by 268 public utilities and used by the commission to determine 269 approved returns on equity for public utilities in this state. 270 Such analysis must: 271 1.âCompare models used by federal agencies and other state 272 utility regulatory bodies with those used by the commission; 273 2.âDetermine whether the models used are generally 274 financially logical; and 275 3.âDetermine whether the models used comport with generally 276 accepted economic theory both inside and outside of the utility 277 industry. 278 (d)âAn assessment of long-term impacts, including the 279 economic repercussions of rising rates of returns on equity, to 280 utilities and their future customers. 281 (e)âA summary providing detailed information regarding the 282 compensation of the executive officers of each public utility 283 providing service to the residents of this state, or the 284 executive officers of a public utilityâs affiliated companies or 285 parent company. Such information must include, but need not be 286 limited to, salaries, benefits, stock options, bonuses, stock 287 buybacks, and other taxable payments, expressed both as dollar 288 amounts and as a percentage of the entityâs total revenue. The 289 summary must include the profits and losses of each entity as 290 reported in its financial statements and highlight any 291 compensation that exceeds the industry average. The commission 292 shall also include any rationale provided by a public utility 293 justifying compensation exceeding the industry average and, for 294 each public utility, an explanation as to the manner in which 295 specific data gathered during the compiling of information 296 informed the commissionâs decisions on the public utilityâs rate 297 change requests. 298 (2)âThe report must provide benchmarking, comparing public 299 utilities providing service to the residents of this state with 300 public utilities providing service to the residents of other 301 states, and include commentary on all findings. 302 Section 9.âSection 366.8261, Florida Statutes, is created 303 to read: 304 366.8261âInterim storm-recovery cost.â 305 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 306 (a)ââElectric utilityâ has the same meaning as in s. 307 366.8255. 308 (b)ââStormâ has the same meaning as in s. 366.8260. 309 (c)ââStorm-recovery chargeâ has the same meaning as in s. 310 366.8260. 311 (d)ââStorm-recovery costsâ has the same meaning as in s. 312 366.8260. 313 (2)âThe commission shall permit an electric utility to 314 implement a storm-recovery charge to recover reasonably 315 estimated storm-recovery costs within 60 days after filing a 316 petition with the commission for the recovery from one or more 317 storms, subject to all of the following conditions: 318 (a)âSuch charge must be on an interim basis. The 319 commissionâs approval of interim storm-recovery costs and a 320 related storm-recovery charge must be on a preliminary basis and 321 is subject to refund pending further review once the total 322 actual storm-recovery costs are known. After the actual costs 323 are reviewed for prudence and reasonableness and are compared to 324 the actual amount recovered through the interim storm-recovery 325 charge, the commission shall determine whether any over or under 326 recovery has occurred. The disposition of any over or under 327 recovery, and associated interest, must be considered by the 328 commission at a separate true-up proceeding. 329 (b)âStorm-recovery costs may not include any expenses 330 already being recovered by the utility in its base rates. 331 (c)âThe commission may require a utility to secure funds 332 collected pursuant to this section to ensure timely refund to 333 customers in the event of over recovery. 334 (3)âIn approving an application for interim storm-recovery 335 costs pursuant to subsection (2), the commission shall also 336 establish a recovery period for such interim costs. This 337 recovery period shall be based upon a reasonable balancing of 338 all of the following factors: 339 (a)âThe financial impact of the length of the recovery 340 period on the utility. 341 (b)âTimeliness of recovery. 342 (c)âAffordability to ratepayers. 343 (d)âAvoiding sudden substantial bill increases to 344 ratepayers. 345 (4)âFunds collected pursuant to this section are subject to 346 true-up. The commission shall require that any refund to or 347 additional collection from ratepayers made as a part of the 348 true-up include interest. 349 (5)âNothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a 350 public utility from applying for, or the commission approving, 351 storm-recovery financing pursuant to s. 366.8260. 352 (6)âThe commission shall adopt rules to implement this 353 section as soon as practicable, but no later than January 1, 354 2027. 355 Section 10.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) and subsection 356 (3) of section 367.081, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 357 367.081âRates; procedure for fixing and changing.â 358 (2)(a)1.âThe commission shall, either upon request or upon 359 its own motion, fix rates which are affordable, just, 360 reasonable, compensatory, and not unfairly discriminatory. In 361 every such proceeding, the commission shall consider the value 362 and quality of the service and the cost of providing the 363 service, which shall include, but not be limited to, debt 364 interest; the requirements of the utility for working capital; 365 maintenance, depreciation, tax, and operating expenses incurred 366 in the operation of all property used and useful in the public 367 service; and a fair return on the investment of the utility in 368 property used and useful in the public service. However, the 369 commission shall not allow the inclusion of contributions-in 370 aid-of-construction in the rate base of any utility during a 371 rate proceeding, nor shall the commission impute prospective 372 future contributions-in-aid-of-construction against the 373 utilityâs investment in property used and useful in the public 374 service; and accumulated depreciation on such contributions-in 375 aid-of-construction shall not be used to reduce the rate base, 376 nor shall depreciation on such contributed assets be considered 377 a cost of providing utility service. 378 2.âFor purposes of such proceedings, the commission shall 379 consider utility property, including land acquired or facilities 380 constructed or to be constructed within a reasonable time in the 381 future, not to exceed 24 months after the end of the historic 382 base year used to set final rates unless a longer period is 383 approved by the commission, to be used and useful in the public 384 service, if: 385 a.âSuch property is needed to serve current customers; 386 b.âSuch property is needed to serve customers 5 years after 387 the end of the test year used in the commissionâs final order on 388 a rate request as provided in subsection (6) at a growth rate 389 for equivalent residential connections not to exceed 5 percent 390 per year; or 391 c.âSuch property is needed to serve customers more than 5 392 full years after the end of the test year used in the 393 commissionâs final order on a rate request as provided in 394 subsection (6) only to the extent that the utility presents 395 clear and convincing evidence to justify such consideration. 396 397 Notwithstanding the provisions of this paragraph, the commission 398 shall approve rates for service which allow a utility to recover 399 from customers the full amount of environmental compliance 400 costs. Such rates may not include charges for allowances for 401 funds prudently invested or similar charges. For purposes of 402 this requirement, the term âenvironmental compliance costsâ 403 includes all reasonable expenses and fair return on any prudent 404 investment incurred by a utility in complying with the 405 requirements or conditions contained in any permitting, 406 enforcement, or similar decisions of the United States 407 Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Environmental 408 Protection, a water management district, or any other 409 governmental entity with similar regulatory jurisdiction. 410 (3)âThe commission, in fixing rates, may determine the 411 prudent cost of providing service during the period of time the 412 rates will be in effect following the entry of a final order 413 relating to the rate request of the utility and may use such 414 costs to determine the revenue requirements that will allow the 415 utility to earn a fair rate of return on its rate base. Any 416 financial model used by the commission in setting and evaluating 417 the return on equity for a utility as part of a proceeding 418 fixing rates must be: 419 (a)âFinancially logical; and 420 (b)âGenerally used and accepted by finance practitioners 421 both within and outside of the regulated utility industry. 422 Section 11.âParagraph (b) of subsection (5) of section 423 377.814, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 424 377.814âMunicipal Solid Waste-to-Energy Program.â 425 (5)âFUNDING.â 426 (b)âFunds awarded under the grant programs set forth in 427 this section may not be used to support, subsidize, or enable 428 the sale of electric power generated by a municipal solid waste 429 to-energy facility to any small electric utility eligible to 430 petition the commission under s. 366.06(5) s. 366.06(4). 431 Section 12.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.